Utah statutes.
13-22-13.   Prohibited practices.

In connection with any solicitation, each of the following acts and practices is prohibited:

(1)  stating or implying that registration constitutes endorsement or approval by the division or any governmental entity;

(2)  violating any of the requirements of this chapter or any rule made under this chapter;

(3)  making any untrue statement of a material fact or failing to state a material fact necessary to make statements made, in the context of the circumstances under which they are made, not misleading, whether in connection with a charitable solicitation or a filing with the division; and

(4)  violating an order issued by the division under Subsection 13-22-3(2) or (3).

